Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.020

License required.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to act or hold himself or herself out as a funeral director or embalmer or discharge any of the duties of a funeral director or embalmer as defined in this chapter unless the person has a valid license under this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to establish, maintain, or operate a funeral establishment without a valid establishment license.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all permits, licenses, or endorsements issued under this chapter must be issued for the year and expire at midnight, the 31st day of January of each year, or at whatever time during any year that ownership or control of any funeral establishment that operates such facility is transferred or sold.

[ 2023 c 185 s 4; 2005 c 365 s 2; 1987 c 150 s 30; 1981 c 43 s 2; 1937 c 108 s 2; RRS s 8314-1. Prior: 1909 c 215 s 1. Formerly RCW 18.39.020 and 18.39.110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 185: See note following RCW 68.05.215.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.